Massachusetts, session 194th, S2855.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 55A of chapter 15 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 56 to 59, inclusive, the words “(6)
review the progress of overall student achievement and; (7) evaluate student performance, school
and district management, overall district governance and any other areas deemed necessary by
the office” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- (6) evaluate the alignment of
literacy instructional materials and curricula with department-recommended evidence-based
literacy instruction and high-quality curricula, as those terms are defined in section 1U of chapter
69; (7) review the progress of overall student achievement; and (8) evaluate student performance,
school and district management, overall district governance and any other areas deemed
necessary by the office.
SECTION 2. Section 1S of said chapter 69, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out, in line 41, the words “and (J)” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- “(J) implementing evidence-based literacy instruction; and (K).”
of 6

SECTION 3. Said section 1S of said chapter 69, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “subgroups”, in line 48, the following words:- “; and
provided further, that district plans shall address implementation and compliance with section
1U.”
SECTION 4. Chapter 69 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
new section after section 1T:-
Section 1U. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Evidence-based literacy instruction”, literacy instruction that is: (i) grounded in
scientific research methods; and (ii) demonstrated through well-designed and well-implemented
studies to produce significant and positive effects on student learning outcomes.
“Five research-based areas in reading instruction”, reading instruction that includes, but
shall not be limited to, phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary and comprehension.
“High-quality curriculum”, curriculum reviewed and approved by the department.
(b) Districts shall select high-quality curricula to meet the curriculum frameworks
pursuant to section 1E for kindergarten through grade 3 literacy that: (i) include instruction in the
five research-based areas in reading instruction; (ii) utilize and are based upon evidence-based
literacy instruction; and (iii) improves competency in the areas of vocabulary development and
oral language.
(c) The department shall provide tools and resources to aid districts in providing adequate
professional development aligned with evidence-based literacy instruction and scientifically-
of 6

based reading research for literacy teachers, paraprofessionals, and reading specialists in grades
pre-kindergarten through third grade.
(d) The department shall create and maintain: (i) A list of department-approved, high-
quality professional development programs and vendors aligned with evidence-based literacy
instruction best practices and scientifically-based reading research; (ii) A set of online training
modules available and free to all teachers that provide training on the foundational practices and
pedagogy aligned with evidence-based literacy instruction best practices and scientifically-based
reading research; and (iii) a list of high-quality curricula. Said lists and modules shall be updated
as often as practicable to remain current with best practices and new curriculum releases.
(e) (1) A district may apply to the department for a waiver to use kindergarten through
grade 3 literacy instruction curriculum that does not appear on the department’s list of high-
quality curricula and that has not already been reviewed by the department.
(2) In determining whether to approve a district’s waiver for a curriculum that is not
already on the department’s list of high-quality curricula and that has not already been reviewed
by the department, the department shall assess whether the district’s curriculum utilizes
evidence-based literacy practices and is high-quality.
(3) A district shall report to the department during the waiver period any student data as
requested.
(4) Curriculum used on a waiver that is assessed and approved by the department and
deemed to meet the requirements of this section shall be allowed to continue as an approved
literacy curriculum used for instruction in the district following the expiration of the waiver
unless the waiver is rescinded pursuant to paragraph (7).
of 6

(5) A district that receives a waiver pursuant to this subsection shall publicly post to its
website any report submitted to the department with information required pursuant to paragraph
(2) and curriculum samples.
(6) The department may audit approved waivers at any time. The audit shall include, but
shall not be limited to: (i) an in-depth review of curriculum materials; (ii) instructional
documentation; and (iii) instructional practices in the classroom.
(7) The department may rescind approval of a waiver based on audit findings before the
expiration of the waiver.
SECTION 5. Said Chapter 69 is hereby amended by inserting after section 1U, the
following new section:-
Section 1V. (a) (1) Annually, not later than August 15, the department shall identify a list
of data requirements that districts shall report on related to curricula consistent with evidence-
based literacy instruction as defined by section 1U of this chapter. The department shall publish
the list of data requirements on the department’s website.
(2) Annually, not later than October 31, each district shall report to the department the
data required by the department pursuant to paragraph (1).
(b) Annually, not later than December 31, the department shall aggregate data collected
from each district pursuant to subsection (a), prepare and publish a report on the aggregated data
and file the report with the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate and the joint
committee on education. The department shall publish the report on the department’s website.
of 6

SECTION 6. Section 38G of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the word “personnel”, in line 281, the following:-
provided that policies and guidelines must include alignment with evidence-based
literacy instruction for educator preparation programs to be approved.
SECTION 7. Said chapter 71 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 57A
the following 2 sections:-
Section 57B. (a) For the purposes of this section and section 57C, the term “screening
assessments” shall mean tools and assessments that can be used to identify students at risk for
poor academic outcomes as determined by the department.
(b) The department, in consultation with the department of early education and care, shall
issue guidelines to districts requiring screening procedures and protocols for reading ability and
progress in literacy skills for all students in kindergarten through grade 3 using screening
assessments. The guidelines shall include a threshold at which a student is determined to be
“significantly below” the grade level benchmark. The commissioner shall annually publish data
on which screening assessments are employed by each district to conduct reading screening.
Section 57C. (a) Each district shall assess each student’s reading ability and progress in
literacy skills from kindergarten through at least grade 3, using a screening assessment approved
by the department. The frequency of the screening assessment shall be determined by the
commissioner but shall be no less than twice per school year. The screening assessment of the
student’s reading ability and progress shall be consistent with section 2 of chapter 71B, the
department’s dyslexia guidelines issued pursuant to section 57A and literacy guidelines issued
pursuant to section 57B.
of 6

(b) If a screening assessment determines that a student is significantly below relevant
100 grade level benchmarks in specific literacy skills, the district shall determine which actions
101 within the general education program will meet the student’s needs, including, but not limited to,
102 differentiated or supplementary evidence-based reading instruction and ongoing monitoring of
103 progress. Not later than 30 days after a screening result that determines a student is significantly
104 below the relevant grade level benchmark, the district shall inform the student’s parent or
105 guardian of the screening results and the school’s response and shall offer the opportunity for a
106 follow-up discussion
107 SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, if a school
108 district does not teach a high-quality curriculum, as defined by section 1U of chapter 69 of the
109 General Laws, as of the effective date of this act, the school district shall include in their 3-year
110 plan pursuant to subsection (c) of section 1S of said chapter 69 when they expect to implement
111 such curriculum.
112 SECTION 9. School districts shall begin reporting required pursuant to paragraph (2) of
113 subsection (a) of section 1V of chapter 69 of the General Laws in the 2026-2027 school year.
114 SECTION 10. Not later than December 31, 2027, the department of elementary and
115 secondary education shall submit the first report required pursuant to subsection (b) of section
116 1V of chapter 69 of the General Laws.
117 SECTION 11. Section 4 of this act shall take effect on August 1, 2028.
of 6